California statutes. Education Code
(c) Nonmonetary awards made pursuant to this section shall be in the form of a plaque or sign.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 734, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Drowning Prevention [51139. - 51141.]

51139.

For purposes of this article, all of the following definitions apply:

(a) “Public school” means a school operated by a school district, county office of education, or a charter school.

(b) “Water safety” means age-appropriate education intended (1) to promote safety in, on, and around bodies of water, including residential and public pools and spas, home water sources such as bathtubs, and open bodies of water such as lakes, rivers, canals, and the ocean, and (2) to reduce the risk of injury or drowning.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 387, Sec. 2.   (AB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

51140.

(a) (1) A drowning or injury prevention organization may provide informational materials, in electronic or hardcopy form, to a public school that serves pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, in accordance with the requirements of this article, regarding all of the following topics:

(A) The role that water safety education courses and swim lessons play in drowning prevention and saving lives.

(B) Local water safety and swimming skills programs in the county and communities served by the public school, including free or reduced-price programs, and how to access information about
 age-appropriate public or private water safety courses and swimming skills programs that result in a certificate indicating successful completion.

(C) Contact information of the organization to receive further water safety education information.

(2) The informational materials shall not be used to solicit funding or donations for the organization.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that public schools that receive information pursuant to paragraph (1) facilitate the sharing of that information with the parents, caregivers, or guardians of pupils.

(b) (1) Upon receipt of the informational materials described in subdivision (a), a public
 school is authorized to provide the informational materials to parents, legal guardians, or caregivers of pupils at the time the pupil enrolls at the public school and at the beginning of each school year, and are encouraged to provide the materials described in subdivision (a) during the first week of May in the year that the informational materials were provided.

(2) In recognition of the importance of drowning as a public health issue impacting the lives of many pupils, public schools are authorized to, and are encouraged to, provide to their pupils water safety informational materials through multiple means, including, but not limited to, school assemblies, classroom instruction, or library programs. These informational materials shall meet the following criteria: 

(A) Be
 age and grade appropriate.

(B) Be aligned with the information from the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51141, and identified by the department pursuant to Section 51900.1.

(C) Be provided for free by drowning prevention or children safety organizations.

(c) Upon request by a public school, a drowning or injury prevention organization that elects to provide informational materials shall provide the informational materials in English and is encouraged to provide informational materials in the other most commonly spoken languages associated with the population attending the school based on available data from the
 department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 387, Sec. 3.   (AB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

51141.

(a) A drowning or injury prevention organization that provides informational materials to a public school pursuant to this article shall adhere to both of the following:

(1) Provide written evidence, in the form of a letter or document, either of which shall be no longer than one page, to a school administrator that demonstrates that the informational materials provided by the drowning or injury prevention organization align with the drowning, drowning prevention, water safety, rescue, and swim skills lesson information found on the drowning prevention web page of the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, which includes evidence-based water safety and drowning prevention
 information vetted through such authorities on drowning and drowning prevention as the American Academy of Pediatrics and the American Red Cross, among other sources.

(2) Provide informational materials at no cost to the public school and allow the school to offer copies of the materials to pupils and parents and decide how the materials are made available.

(b) A school administrator or school entity authorized by the school district or school, which also may include the school’s parent-teacher association or an equivalent association, that engages with a drowning or injury prevention organization pursuant to this article shall not be responsible for confirming the drowning or injury prevention organization’s compliance with paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 387, Sec. 4.   (AB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Required Courses of Study [51200. - 51284.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [51200. - 51206.4.]

51200.

Except as otherwise provided, the provisions contained in this chapter are the requirements for courses of study in grades 1 through 12.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51202.

The adopted course of study shall provide instruction at the appropriate elementary and secondary grade levels and subject areas in personal and public safety and accident prevention, including emergency first aid instruction, instruction in hemorrhage control, treatment for poisoning, resuscitation techniques, and cardiopulmonary resuscitation when appropriate equipment is available; fire prevention; the protection and conservation of resources, including the necessity for the protection of our environment; and health, including venereal disease and the effects of alcohol, narcotics, drugs, and tobacco upon the human body. The health instruction may include prenatal care for pregnant women and violence as a public health issue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1065, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

51203.

(a) Instruction upon the nature of alcohol, narcotics, restricted dangerous drugs as defined in Section 11032 of the Health and Safety Code, and other dangerous substances and their effects upon the human system as determined by science shall be included in the curriculum of all elementary and secondary schools.

(b) Instruction on the effects of alcohol, narcotics, restricted dangerous drugs as defined in Section 11032 of the Health and Safety Code, and other dangerous substances upon prenatal development as determined by science shall be included in the curriculum of all secondary schools.

(c) Instruction on the nature and effects of alcohol pursuant to this section shall include information about excessive alcohol use and the short-term and long-term health risks of excessive alcohol use. This instruction shall include information about excessive drinking, the immediate effects of alcohol that increase the risks of harmful health conditions, and how excessive alcohol use can lead to the development of chronic diseases and other serious problems, including alcohol-related deaths and mental health problems. The instruction about mental health problems may include instruction about depression and anxiety.

(d) The governing board of the school district shall adopt regulations specifying the grade or grades and the course or
 courses in which the instruction with respect to alcohol, narcotics, restricted dangerous drugs as defined in Section 11032 of the Health and Safety Code, and other dangerous substances shall be included.

(e) All persons responsible for the preparation or enforcement of courses of study shall provide for instruction on the subjects of alcohol, narcotics, restricted dangerous drugs as defined in Section 11032 of the Health and Safety Code, and other dangerous substances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 314, Sec. 1.   (AB 2865)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

51204.

Any course of study adopted pursuant to this division shall be designed to fit the needs of the pupils for which the course of study is prescribed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51204.5.

Instruction in social sciences shall include the early history of California and a study of the role and contributions of people of all genders, Native Americans, African Americans, Latino Americans, Asian Americans, Pacific Islanders, European Americans, LGBTQ+ Americans, persons with disabilities, and members of other ethnic, cultural, religious, and socioeconomic status groups, to the economic, political, and social development of California and the United States of America, with particular emphasis on portraying the role of these groups in contemporary society.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 229, Sec. 7.   (AB 1078)   Effective September 25, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

51205.

Pupils enrolled in a year-round school pursuant to Part 22 (commencing with Section 37000) shall have access, as necessary, to an equal educational opportunity as provided during summer school to pupils enrolled in regular school year programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1334, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

51206.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the physical fitness and motor development of children in the public elementary schools is of equal importance to that of other elements of the curriculum.

The Legislature further finds that, in order to improve the level of physical education in the elementary grades, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, through the regular budget process, employ an elementary physical education specialist to develop model curriculum standards in physical education for grades 1 to 8, inclusive, provide technical assistance to teachers, and assist school districts in the development of their physical education programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1590, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

51206.4.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Digital citizenship” means a diverse set of skills related to current technology and social media, including the norms of appropriate, responsible, and healthy behavior.

(2) “Media literacy” means the ability to access, analyze, evaluate, and use media and encompasses the foundational skills that lead to digital citizenship.

(b) On or before July 1, 2019, the department shall make available to school districts on its Internet Web site a list of resources and instructional materials on media literacy, including media literacy
 professional development programs for teachers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 448, Sec. 2.   (SB 830)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Course of Study, Grades 1 to 6 [51210. - 51212.]

51210.

(a) The adopted course of study for grades 1 to 6, inclusive, shall include instruction, beginning in grade 1 and continuing through grade 6, in the following areas of study:

(1) English, including knowledge of, and appreciation for, literature and the language, as well as the skills of speaking, reading, listening, spelling, handwriting, including instruction in cursive or joined italics in the appropriate grade levels, and composition.

(2) Mathematics, including concepts, operational skills, and problem solving.

(3) Social sciences, drawing upon the disciplines of anthropology, economics, geography, history, political science,
 psychology, and sociology, designed to fit the maturity of the pupils. Instruction shall provide a foundation for understanding the history, resources, development, and government of California and the United States of America; the development of the American economic system, including the role of the entrepreneur and labor; the relations of persons to their human and natural environment; eastern and western cultures and civilizations; contemporary issues; the wise use of natural resources; and the Spanish colonization of California and the Gold Rush Era, including the treatment and perspectives of Native Americans during those periods.

(4) Science, including
 the biological and physical aspects, with emphasis on the processes of experimental inquiry, on the place of humans in ecological systems, on the causes and effects of climate change, and on the methods to mitigate and adapt to climate change. Appropriate coursework including material on the causes and effects of climate change and methods to mitigate and adapt to climate change shall be offered to pupils as soon as possible, commencing no later than the 2024–25 school year.

(5) Visual and performing arts, including instruction in the subjects of dance, music, theater, and visual arts, aimed at the development of aesthetic appreciation and the skills of creative expression.

(6) Health, including instruction in the principles and practices of individual, family, and community health.

(7) Physical education, with
 emphasis upon the physical activities for the pupils that may be conducive to health and vigor of body and mind, for a total period of time of not less than 200 minutes each 10 schooldays, excluding recesses and the lunch period, except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 51222.

(8) Other studies that the governing board may prescribe.

(b) (1) A complaint that a school district or county superintendent of schools has not complied with the instructional minute requirements of paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) may be filed with a school district or county superintendent of schools pursuant to the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1
 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a school district or county superintendent of schools may appeal the decision to the department pursuant to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and shall receive a written appeal decision within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the appeal.

(3) If a school district or county superintendent of schools finds merit in a complaint, or the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal, the school district or county superintendent of schools shall provide a remedy to all affected pupils, parents, and guardians.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that neither the original provisions of this section, nor any
 subsequent amendments to it, were intended to create a private right of action. However, nothing in this subdivision shall restrict or expand the existing right of any party to seek relief from noncompliance with this section pursuant to a writ of mandate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 658, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 1821)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

51210.1.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(A) The Education Code currently mandates 200 minutes of physical education every 10 schooldays for pupils in elementary school. Recent studies have shown that the vast majority of children and youth are not physically fit.

(B) According to a March 1997 report by the Centers for Disease Control, the percentage of children and adolescents who are overweight has more than doubled in the last 30 years. Most of this increase occurred within the last 10 years.

(C) Nearly 40 percent of children of ages five to eight years have health conditions that significantly increase their risk of early heart disease.

(D) Some 70 percent of girls, and 40 percent of boys, who are from 6 to 12 years of age do not have enough muscle strength to do more than one pullup.

(E) Most children lead inactive lives. On the average, first through fourth graders spend two hours watching television on schooldays and spend close to three and one-half hours watching television on weekend days.

(2) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature that all children shall have access to a high-quality, comprehensive, and developmentally appropriate physical education program on a regular basis.

(b) (1) Each school district selected by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to paragraph (2) shall report to the Superintendent of Public Instruction in the Coordinated Compliance Review as to the extent of its compliance with subdivision (g) of Section 51210 for grades 1 to 6, inclusive, during that school year.

(2) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall select not less than 10 percent of the school districts of the state to report compliance with the provisions set forth in paragraph (1). The school districts selected shall provide a random and accurate sampling of the state as a whole.

(c) For purposes of determining compliance with paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b), the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall not count the time spent in recesses and the lunch period.

(d) A school district that fails to comply with the existing statutory requirements shall issue a corrective action plan to the State Department of Education in accordance with the Coordinated Compliance Review process.

(e) This section shall not be applicable to high schools.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 51223.1 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 943, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

51210.2.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the physical fitness and motor development of children in the public elementary schools is of equal importance to that of other elements of the curriculum.

(b) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature to encourage each school district maintaining an elementary school composed of any of grades 1 to 6, inclusive, to do one of the following:

(1) Employ a credentialed physical education teacher to provide instruction in physical education for each class of grades 1 to 6, inclusive, within any elementary school in the district for a total period of time of not less than 200 minutes each 10 schooldays, exclusive of recesses and the lunch period.

(2) Provide each teacher providing instruction in physical education to any of grades 1 to 6, inclusive, within any elementary school in the district with yearly theoretical practical training in developmental physical education, as set forth in the Physical Education Framework adopted by the State Department of Education pursuant to Section 33350, except that any teacher who has successfully completed one college level course in elementary physical education shall not be subject to this paragraph.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 943, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

51210.3.

(a) The governing board of a school district may designate a credentialed teacher at each elementary school as a science coach, or provide staff development to teachers, in order to accomplish the objectives described in subdivision (b), as determined by the governing board.

(b) The designated teacher shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop, coordinate, and provide instruction in a science curriculum that incorporates experimentation. The curriculum shall be aligned to the California standards for investigation and experimentation, and be designed to develop all of the following:

(A) Understanding of basic scientific facts and principles.

(B) Mathematics skills.

(C) Reading comprehension.

(D) Analytical and intellectual skills required to pose and answer questions.

(2) Act as a coach for other teachers at the school in the provision of a science curriculum based on experimentation.

(c) This section does not preclude the assignment of duties to a science coach that are not listed in subdivision (b) and relate to developing, coordinating, and providing instruction in a science curriculum that incorporates experimentation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 549, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

51210.4.

The State Department of Education shall incorporate nutrition education curriculum content into the health curriculum framework at its next revision. This curriculum shall focus on pupils’ eating behaviors, be based on theories and methods proven effective by published research. Nutrition education shall be designed to help pupils learn all of the following:

(a) Nutritional knowledge, including but not limited to, the benefits of healthy eating, essential nutrients, nutritional deficiencies, principles of healthy weight management, the use and misuse of dietary supplements, and safe food preparation, handling, and storage.

(b) Nutrition-related skills, including, but not limited to, planning a healthy meal, understanding and using food labels, and critically evaluating nutrition information, misinformation, and commercial food advertising.

(c) How to assess their own personal eating habits, set goals for improvement, and achieve those goals by using the Food Guide Pyramid, Dietary Guidelines for Americans, Nutrition Fact Labels, and the Physical Activity Pyramid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1163, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

51210.5.

The instruction in all areas of study specified in subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive, of Section 51210 as deemed appropriate by the governing board and consistent with the adopted course of study for each subject area, may include grade-level appropriate instruction on violence awareness and prevention, which may include personal testimony in the form of oral or video histories that illustrate the economic and cultural effects of violence within a city, the state, and the country.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 497, Sec. 1.   (SB 552)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

51210.8.

(a) On or before March 1, 2008, based on recommendations of the Superintendent, the State Board of Education shall adopt content standards in the curriculum area of health education.

(b) The content standards shall provide a framework for instruction that a school may offer in the curriculum area of health education. This section does not require a school to follow the content standards.

(c) The content standards described in subdivision (a) shall only be developed if sufficient funds from any source are made available for that purpose, including state, federal, or private sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 645, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

51212.

It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature to encourage the establishment of programs of instruction in world language, with instruction beginning as early as feasible for each school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 15.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Courses of Study, Grades 7 to 12 [51220. - 51230.]

51220.

The adopted course of study for grades 7 to 12, inclusive, shall offer courses in the following areas of study:

(a) English, including knowledge of and appreciation for literature, language, and composition, and the skills of reading, listening, and speaking.

(b) (1) Social sciences, drawing upon the disciplines of anthropology, economics, geography, history, political science, psychology, and sociology, designed to fit the maturity of the pupils. Instruction shall provide a foundation for understanding the history, resources, development, and government of California and the United States of America; instruction in our American legal system, the operation of the juvenile and adult criminal justice
 systems, and the rights and duties of citizens under the criminal and civil law and the State and Federal Constitutions; the development of the American economic system, including the role of the entrepreneur and labor; personal financial literacy; the relations of persons to their human and natural environment; eastern and western cultures and civilizations; human rights issues, with particular attention to the study of the inhumanity of genocide, slavery, and the Holocaust, and, to the extent instruction is provided on the Spanish colonization of California or the Gold Rush Era, the treatment and perspectives of Native Americans during those periods; and contemporary issues.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, genocide may include the Armenian Genocide. The “Armenian Genocide” means the torture, starvation, and murder of 1,500,000 Armenians, which included death marches into the Syrian desert, by the rulers of the Ottoman Turkish Empire and the exile of more than 500,000 innocent people during the period from 1915 to 1923, inclusive.

(c) World language or languages, beginning not later than grade 7, designed to develop a facility for understanding, speaking, reading, and writing the particular language.

(d) Physical education, with emphasis given to physical activities that are conducive to health and to vigor of body and mind, as required by Section 51222.

(e) Science, including the physical and biological aspects, with
 emphasis on basic concepts, theories, and processes of scientific investigation, on the place of humans in ecological systems, on the causes and effects of climate change, on the methods to mitigate and adapt to climate change, and with appropriate applications of the interrelation and interdependence of the sciences. Appropriate coursework including material on the causes and effects of climate change and methods to mitigate and adapt to climate change shall be offered to pupils as soon as possible, commencing no later than the 2024–25 school year.

(f) Mathematics, including instruction designed to develop mathematical understandings, operational skills, and insight into problem solving procedures.

(g) Visual and performing arts, including dance, music, theater, and visual arts, with emphasis upon development of aesthetic appreciation and the skills of creative expression.

(h) Applied arts, including instruction in the areas of consumer education, family and consumer sciences education, industrial arts, general business education, or general agriculture.

(i) Career technical education designed and conducted for the purpose of preparing youth for gainful employment in the occupations and in the numbers that are appropriate to the personnel needs of the state and the community served and relevant to the career desires and needs of the pupils.

(j) Automobile driver education, designed to develop a knowledge of the Vehicle Code and other laws of this state relating to the operation of motor vehicles, a proper acceptance of personal responsibility in traffic, a true appreciation of the causes, seriousness, and consequences of traffic accidents, and the knowledge and attitudes necessary for the
 safe operation of motor vehicles. A course in automobile driver education shall include education in the safe operation of motorcycles.

(k) Other studies that the governing board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 810, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 1871)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

51220.1.

In addition to the requirements specified in subdivision (j) of Section 51220, automobile driver education shall be designed to develop a knowledge of the dangers involved in consuming alcohol or drugs in connection with the operation of a motor vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1455, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

51220.2.

(a) For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 51220, “instruction in our American legal system, the operation of the juvenile and adult criminal justice systems, and the rights and duties of citizens under the criminal and civil law and the State and Federal Constitutions” may include participation in a teen court or peer court program as described in subdivision (b).

(b) A teen court or peer court program shall include each of the following components:

(1) Adjudicates nonviolent misdemeanor offenses committed by pupils in which both the defendant and the defendant’s parents agree to participate in the teen court or peer court proceedings and agree to abide by the teen court’s or peer court’s ruling.

(2) Uses other pupils as jurors, district attorney, counsel for the defense, bailiff, and court clerk.

(3) Operates in cooperation with the court, probation department, district attorney, and public defender.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 607, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

51220.3.

The instruction in all areas of study specified in subdivisions (a) to (j), inclusive, of Section 51220 as deemed appropriate by the governing board and consistent with the adopted course of study for each subject area, may include grade-level appropriate instruction on violence awareness and prevention, which may include personal testimony in the form of oral or video histories that illustrate the economic and cultural effects of violence within a city, the state, and the country.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 497, Sec. 2.   (SB 552)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

51220.4.

For purposes of subdivision (j) of Section 51220, a course in automobile driver education shall include, but is not limited to, both of the following:

(a) Education regarding the rights and duties of a motorist as those rights and duties pertain to pedestrians and the rights and duties of pedestrians as those rights and duties pertain to traffic laws and traffic safety.

(b) Viewing the Department of Justice’s video on proper conduct during traffic stops created pursuant to Section 1656.1 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.   (AB 2537)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

51220.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) The family is our most fundamental social institution and the means by which we care for, prepare, and train our children to be productive members of society.

(2) Social research shows increasingly that the disintegration of the family is a major cause of increased welfare enrollment, child abuse and neglect, juvenile delinquency, and criminal activity.

(3) The lack of knowledge of parenting skills and the lack of adequate preparation to assume parental responsibilities are not only major causes of family disintegration, but also contribute substantially to the disastrous consequences of teen pregnancy.

(4) Because the state government bears much of the economic and social burden associated with the disintegration of the family in California, the state has a legitimate and vital interest in adequately preparing its residents for parenthood.

(b) The Legislature recognizes that the public education system is the most efficient and effective means to educate the populace on a large-scale basis, and intends, therefore, to use the public education system to ensure that each California resident has an opportunity to acquire knowledge of parenting skills prior to becoming a parent. That knowledge should include, at a bare minimum, all of the following:

(1) Child development and growth.

(2) Effective parenting.

(3) Prevention of child abuse.

(4) Nutrition.

(5) Household finances and budgeting.

(6) Personal and family interaction and relations.

(7) Methods to promote self-esteem.

(8) Effective decisionmaking skills.

(9) Family and individual health.

(c) Commencing with the 1995–96 fiscal year, the adopted course of study for grade 7 or 8 shall include the equivalent content of a one-semester course in parenting skills and education. All pupils entering grade 7 on or after July 1, 1995, shall be offered that course or its equivalent content during grade 7 or 8, or both. On or before January 1, 1995, the State Department of Education shall supply, to each school district that includes a grade 7 or 8, a sample curriculum suitable either for implementation as a stand-alone one-semester course or for incorporation within identified existing required or optional courses, with content designed to develop a knowledge of topics including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Child growth and development.

(2) Parental responsibilities.

(3) Household budgeting.

(4) Child abuse and neglect issues.

(5) Personal hygiene.

(6) Maintaining healthy relationships.

(7) Teen parenting issues.

(8) Self-esteem.

A district that implements the curriculum set forth in this subdivision in a stand-alone required course may exempt a pupil from the course if the pupil requests the exemption and satisfactorily demonstrates mastery of the course content. The district shall determine the method by which a pupil may demonstrate this mastery.

(d) Commencing with the 1993–94 fiscal year, community college districts may offer, to interested individuals, noncredit fee-supported courses in parenting skills and education as described in subdivision (c).

(e) This section is not intended to replace existing courses that accomplish the intent of this section. School districts may meet the requirements of this section with existing courses of study offered in any of grades 6 to 9, inclusive, that includes the course contents identified in subdivision (c). When the parenting skills and education curriculum is incorporated within courses other than consumer and home economics courses, these courses are not subject to the curricular standards specified in Section 2 of Chapter 775 of the Statutes of 1989 or in the consumer and home economics education model performance standards and framework. Teachers of courses other than consumer and home economics that incorporate parenting skills and education are not required to meet the qualifications specified for teachers of consumer and home economics.

(f) This section shall become operative only if a funding source is identified by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for the purposes of this section on or before January 1, 1995.

(g) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall identify the funding source for this section from existing resources or private resources, or both, that may be available for the purposes of this section. The superintendent shall notify school districts when sufficient funds have been identified and are allocated to cover all costs relating to the operation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 637, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Section conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

51220.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a private school is not required to offer courses in driver education or driver training.

(b) This section shall not be construed to require a private school to offer automobile driver education that meets the requirements of this chapter unless the private school requests the Department of Motor Vehicles to issue a certificate of satisfactory completion form.

(c) For purposes of subdivision (j) of Section 51220, Section 51220.1, and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 12814.6 of the Vehicle Code, the satisfactory completion by a pupil of an Internet-based, correspondence, or other distance-learning course in automobile driver education offered by a private secondary school satisfies the driver education instructional requirements of those provisions and the Department of Motor Vehicles shall issue certificates of satisfactory completion forms if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The private secondary school has a current affidavit or statement on file in compliance with Section 33190.

(2) The private secondary school utilizes the Department of Motor Vehicles’ driver education curriculum developed under subdivision (f) of former Section 12814.8 of the Vehicle Code for providing the automobile driver education course, or the private school certifies to the Department of Motor Vehicles that the curriculum used is educationally equivalent to the Department of Motor Vehicles’ curriculum.

(3) All certificates issued to a private school by the Department of Motor Vehicles shall remain under the exclusive control of that school. A school shall only issue a certificate to a student who is enrolled in the private school, and has successfully completed a driver education course offered by that school.

(4) All course curriculums contain the school name, school address, and telephone number.

(5) Internet web pages or CD courses are reasonably secure and protected from unauthorized access, modifications, or extraction of confidential data.

(6) Test questions for Internet and CD courses are secured and randomly extracted to safeguard from copying.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 314, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

51221.

Instruction required by subdivision (b) of Section 51220 in the area of study of social sciences shall also provide a foundation for understanding the wise use of natural resources.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51221.1.

(a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Collaborative” means the California Teachers Collaborative for Holocaust and Genocide Education.

(2) “Genocide” means, as defined by the United Nations Convention on the Prevention and Punishment of the Crime of Genocide, any of the following acts committed with the intent to destroy, in whole or in part, a national, ethnic, racial, or religious group:

(A) Killing members of the group.

(B) Causing serious bodily or mental harm to members
 of the group.

(C) Deliberately inflicting on the group conditions of life calculated to bring about, in whole or in part, its physical destruction.

(D) Imposing measures intended to prevent births within the group.

(E) Forcibly transferring children of the group to another group.

(3) “Holocaust,” as described by the United States Holocaust Memorial Museum, was the systematic, bureaucratic, state-sponsored persecution and murder of 6,000,000 European Jews by the Nazi regime and its allies and collaborators; the Nazis also targeted other groups for persecution and murder, including Roma, people with disabilities, some Slavic peoples, especially Poles and Russians, Black people, communists, socialists,
 Jehovah’s Witnesses, gay men, and people the Nazis called “asocials” and “professional criminals.”

(b) The California Teachers Collaborative for Holocaust and Genocide Education is hereby established. The collaborative shall be responsible for establishing a statewide teacher professional development program on genocide, including the Holocaust, for school district, county office of education, and charter school teachers.

(c) The collaborative shall consist of leading genocide and Holocaust education organizations and institutions, genocide survivors, educators, and community leaders.
